Washington statutes.
RCW 2.43.060

Waiver of right to interpreter.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1174-S2.SL) ***

(1) The right to a qualified interpreter may not be waived except when:

(a) A non-English-speaking person requests a waiver; and

(b) The appointing authority determines on the record that the waiver has been made knowingly, voluntarily, and intelligently.

(2) Waiver of a qualified interpreter may be set aside and an interpreter appointed, in the discretion of the appointing authority, at any time during the proceedings.

[1989 c 358 s 6. Formerly RCW 2.42.250.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 358: See note following RCW 2.43.010.